Washington statutes.
RCW 19.72.110

Release from official's, executor's, licensee's, etc., bond—Notice, service, proof.

Any surety upon any bond described in RCW 19.72.109 desiring to be released from subsequent liability and responsibility on any such bond shall serve upon the principal of such bond a written notice that on and after a certain date to be fixed in the notice, which shall be not less than ten days from the date of the service of the notice, the surety will withdraw as surety from such bond and shall serve a copy of such notice upon the official with whom such bond is filed not less than ten days prior to the date fixed in the notice as the date of termination of liability. If such principal is an individual and resides within the state of Washington, or is a corporation doing business in the state of Washington, such notice shall be personally served upon such individual, or if the principal is a firm or a corporation, such notice shall be served personally upon any person upon whom personal service of summons may be made under the existing laws of the state of Washington. If the principal is an individual and is not a resident of the state of Washington, or cannot be found therein, or if the principal is a foreign corporation, such notice shall be mailed by registered mail to the last known address of such principal, if any, which fact shall be shown by affidavit filed with the notice of withdrawal as hereinafter provided, and a copy of such notice shall be published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county of the residence of the official with whom such bond is filed. The date of the last publication of notice shall be not less than twenty days from the date stated therein as the date upon which the surety will withdraw from the bond. Proof of such service or publication shall be made by affidavit and filed with the official with whom the bond is filed at least ten days before the date fixed in the notice of withdrawal.

[ 1937 c 145 s 2; RRS s 9943. Formerly RCW 19.72.110 and 19.72.120.] [SLC-RO-17.]